Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
665

ESCHEAT

Part I. Land

Section

665-1 Information, hearing, decree

665-2 Conclusive presumptions

665-3 Defenses

665-4 Sale; disposition of proceeds

665-5 Claim to proceeds

Part II. Unclaimed Moneys--Repealed

665-11 to 16 Repealed

Part III. Corporate Stock--Repealed

665-21 to 32 Repealed

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Rules of Court

Applicability of Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rule 81(b)(5).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next